Utah statutes.
22-5-8.   Nonliability of third persons.
(1)  No person who participates in the acquisition, disposition, assignment or
transfer of a security by or to a fiduciary including a person who guarantees
the signature of the fiduciary is liable for participation in any breach of
fiduciary duty by reason of failure to inquire whether the transaction
involves such a breach unless it is shown that he acted with actual knowledge
that the proceeds of the transaction were being or were to be used wrongfully
for the individual benefit of the fiduciary or that the transaction was
otherwise in breach of duty.
(2)  If a corporation or transfer agent makes a transfer pursuant to an
assignment by a fiduciary, a person who guaranteed the signature of the
fiduciary is not liable on the guarantee to any person to whom the corporation
or transfer agent by reason of this act incurs no liability.
(3)  This section does not impose any liability upon the corporation or its
transfer agent.
